Virginia statutes. Title 43. Mechanics’ and Certain Other Liens.
Chapter 8. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 43-64.
How notices served, acts done, etc., in case of bankruptcy, death or absconding.

Whenever any act is required to be done by, or notice is to be given to, a person mentioned in any section of this title, or of Chapter 17 (§

8.01-426

et seq.) of Title 8.01, if such person become bankrupt, the act may be done by, or the notice given to, either the bankrupt or his trustee; or if such person die, the act may be done by, or the notice given to, his personal representative; or if he abscond, the notice may be given to any person over the age of sixteen years found at his last known place of business or residence, or if no such person be found there, by posting the same at the front door of such place of business or residence, or at some other conspicuous part of the building, or he may be proceeded against by order of publication as a nonresident of the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1919, § 6442; 1944, p. 338.

§ 43-65.
Protection of assignees, transferees or endorsees of debts secured by mechanics’ or crop liens.

Whenever any debt secured on real estate or personal property by a mechanics’ or crop lien has been assigned, transferred, or endorsed to another, in whole or in part by the original payee thereof, such payee, assignee, transferee, or endorsee may cause a memorandum or statement of the assignment to such assignee, transferee, or endorsee to be recorded, which memorandum or statement shall be signed by the assignor, transferrer, or endorser, or his duly authorized agent or attorney, and when so signed and the signature thereto attested by the clerk in whose office such encumbrance is recorded the same shall operate as a notice of such assignment and transfer. Such assignment, transfer, or endorsement shall reference the book and page where the original debt secured on real estate or personal property is recorded. And where such transfer by the payee is so entered in the proper book, subsequent transfers may likewise be entered in the same manner and with like effect. Provided, however, this section shall not apply to conditional sales contracts of personal property.

History.

Code 1919, § 6457; 1932, p. 548; 1934, p. 249; 2014, c. 330.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 330 deleted “entered on the margin of the page in the book where such encumbrance securing the same is” following “endorsee to be” in the first sentence, added the second sentence, and substituted “in the proper book” for “on the margin of the proper book” in the last sentence; and made minor stylistic changes.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12B M.J. Mechanics’ Liens, § 6; 13A M.J. Mortgages and Deeds of Trust, § 80.

§ 43-66.
Purchaser not affected by liens of Mutual Assurance Society against Fire.

The lien of the Mutual Assurance Society against Fire on buildings in the Commonwealth of Virginia upon property insured therein for quotas assessed against the policies of such property owners shall not be valid against purchasers of such property for valuable consideration without notice of the existence of such insurance, except from the time the Society shall have complied with the provisions of this section. The Society shall have prepared and kept in the clerk’s office of the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond, and of the circuit court of each county and the circuit court of each city in which the Society insures property, a book to be called the “Mutual Assurance Society’s Lien Book.” Such book when left with the clerk shall become a public record and shall be kept open to the inspection of the public. The Society shall have entered in such book a brief description of the property insured by it upon which it claims a lien, the date and amount of the policy and the name of the parties to whom the policy was issued, and the date of the entry shall be made in such book.

History.

Code 1919, § 6458.